Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-503 Notice of dishonor. (a)
The obligation of an indorser stated in section 490:3-415(a) and the obligation
of a drawer stated in section 490:3-414(d) may not be enforced unless (i) the
indorser or drawer is given notice of dishonor of the instrument complying with
this section or (ii) notice of dishonor is excused under section 490:3-504(b).

(b) Notice of dishonor may be given by any
person; may be given by any commercially reasonable means, including an oral,
written, or electronic communication; and is sufficient if it reasonably
identifies the instrument and indicates that the instrument has been dishonored
or has not been paid or accepted. Return of an instrument given to a bank for
collection is sufficient notice of dishonor.

(c) Subject to section 490:3-504(c), with
respect to an instrument taken for collection by a collecting bank, notice of
dishonor must be given (i) by the bank before midnight of the next banking day
following the banking day on which the bank receives notice of dishonor of the
instrument, or (ii) by any other person within thirty days following the day on
which the person receives notice of dishonor. With respect to any other
instrument, notice of dishonor must be given within thirty days following the
day on which dishonor occurs. [L 1991, c 118, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next